Utah statutes.
16-16-109.   Requirements of other laws.

(1)  This chapter does not alter or amend any law that governs the licensing and regulation of an individual or entity in carrying on a specific business or profession even if that law permits the business or profession to be conducted by a limited cooperative association, a foreign cooperative, or its members.

(2)  A limited cooperative association may not conduct an activity that, under law of this state other than this chapter, may be conducted only by an entity that meets specific requirements for the internal affairs of that entity unless the organic rules of the association conform to those requirements.

